src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_51karkearehu

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}rehuitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}rehuilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}rehuilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}rehuille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}rehuista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}rehuina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:iden{hyph?}rehujen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}rehuissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}rehut  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ita{hyph?}rehuja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}rehuikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}rehuiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}rehutta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}rehulta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}rehulla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}rehulle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}rehusta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}rehuna  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}rehun  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}rehussa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}rehu  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}rehua  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}rehukse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}rehuksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51kevytsarja

+Pl+Abe:ittä{hyph?}sarjoitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltä{hyph?}sarjoilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illä{hyph?}sarjoilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}sarjoille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istä{hyph?}sarjoista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inä{hyph?}sarjoina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:iden{hyph?}sarjojen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issä{hyph?}sarjoissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:et{hyph?}sarjat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:itä{hyph?}sarjoja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}sarjoikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}sarjoiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:että{hyph?}sarjatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltä{hyph?}sarjalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellä{hyph?}sarjalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elle{hyph?}sarjalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estä{hyph?}sarjasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enä{hyph?}sarjana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:en{hyph?}sarjan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essä{hyph?}sarjassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:t{hyph?}sarja  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttä{hyph?}sarjaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}sarjakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}sarjaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51kirjavapillike

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}pillikkeittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}pillikkeiltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}pillikkeillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}pillikkeille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}pillikkeistä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}pillikkeinä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}pillikkeiden  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}pillikkeissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}pillikkeet  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}pillikkeitä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}pillikkeikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}pillikkeiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}pillikkeettä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}pillikkeeltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}pillikkeellä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}pillikkeelle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}pillikkeestä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}pillikkeena  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}pillikkeen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}pillikkeessä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}pillike  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}pillike  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}pillikettä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}pillikkeekse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}pillikkeeksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51kuivakakku

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}kakuitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}kakuilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}kakuilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}kakuille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}kakuista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}kakkuina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}kakkujen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}kakuissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}kakut  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}kakkuja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kakuikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kakuiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}kakutta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}kakulta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}kakulla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}kakulle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}kakusta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}kakuna  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}kakun  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}kakussa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kakku  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}kakkua  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kakukse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kakuksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51kuivakukka

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}kukitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}kukilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}kukilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}kukille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}kukista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}kukkina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}kukkien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}kukissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}kukat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}kukkia  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kukikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kukiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}kukatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}kukalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}kukalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}kukalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}kukasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}kukkana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}kukan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}kukassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kukka  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}kukkaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kukakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kukaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51kuivamuona

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}muonitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}muonilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}muonilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}muonille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}muonista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}muonina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}muonien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}muonissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}muonat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}muonia  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}muonikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}muoniksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}muonatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}muonalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}muonalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}muonalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}muonasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}muonana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}muonan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}muonassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}muona  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}muonaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}muonakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}muonaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
