src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
karkearehu+N:karke  NOUN_51karkearehu  ;
kevytsarja+N:kevy  NOUN_51kevytsarja  ;
kirjavapillike+N:kirjav  NOUN_51kirjavapillike  ;
kuivakakku+N:kuiv  NOUN_51kuivakakku  ;
kuivakukka+N:kuiv  NOUN_51kuivakukka  ;
kuivamuona+N:kuiv  NOUN_51kuivamuona  ;
